North Dakota, session 69, SB2404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEPARTMENT - DIGITAL
ACCESSIBILITY COMPLIANCE - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in
the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $1,500,000, or so much of
the sum as may be necessary, to the information technology department for the purpose of updating
state-controlled websites and digital content to comply with digital accessibility provisions of the federal
Americans with Disabilities Act, for the period beginning with the effective date of this Act, and ending
June 30, 2027. The funding appropriated in this section is considered a one-time funding item.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION - FEDERAL LAWSUIT
INTERVENTION - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund
in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $325,000, or so much of the sum as may
be necessary, to the public service commission for federal lawsuit intervention efforts, for the period
beginning with the effective date of this Act, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding appropriated in this
section is considered a one-time funding item.
SECTION 3. PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION - FEDERAL LAWSUIT INTERVENTION -
CONTINGENT LOAN AUTHORIZATION. During the period beginning with the effective date of this Act
and ending June 30, 2027, if the funding appropriated in section 2 of this Act is not sufficient for federal
lawsuit intervention efforts, the public service commission may use the loan authorization provided in
section 4 of House Bill No. 1008, as approved by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly, to obtain funds for
federal lawsuit intervention efforts.
SECTION 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act becomes effective immediately upon its filing with the
secretary of state.

S. B. NO. 2404 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2404.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2026.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2026.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2026,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State